District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-3304

Depredation of fixtures in houses.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1324, ch. 854, § 825
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 3(k), 50 DCR 10996

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3104.
1973 Ed., § 22-3104.